Utah statutes.
78A-8-108.   Evening hours -- Judges pro tempore.
(1)  The district or justice court may request that the Supreme Court appoint
a member of the Utah State Bar in good standing, with the member's consent, as
judge pro tempore to hear and determine small claims at times, including
evening sessions, to be set by the court.
(2)  After being duly sworn, judges pro tempore shall:
(a)  serve voluntarily and without compensation at the request of the court;
and
(b)  be extended the same immunities, and have the same powers with respect to
matters within the jurisdiction of the small claims court as exercised by a
regular judge.
